Utah statutes.
53-3-420.   Driver's driving record available for certain purposes.

The division shall provide full information regarding the driving record of any holder of a CDL within 10 days of a request to:

(1)  the driver license administrator of any other state requesting that information;

(2)  any employer or prospective employer of a person to drive a commercial motor vehicle upon request and payment of a fee under Section 53-3-105;

(3)  insurers of commercial motor vehicle drivers upon request and payment of a fee under Section 53-3-105; and

(4)  the Secretary of the United States Department of Transportation.

